Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-960.02
Community colleges; foundations education.

The community college areas shall serve as the primary public postsecondary institutions for foundations education.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 101;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 16.